Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5722.01
Employees; verification of status required; exclusion.

(1) The Tax Commissioner shall not approve or grant to any person any tax incentive under the Nebraska Advantage Act unless the taxpayer provides evidence satisfactory to the Tax Commissioner that the taxpayer electronically verified the work eligibility status of all newly hired employees employed in Nebraska.

(2) For purposes of calculating any tax incentive under the act, the Tax Commissioner shall exclude hours worked and compensation paid to an employee that is not eligible to work in Nebraska as verified under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) This section does not apply to any application filed under the Nebraska Advantage Act prior to October 1, 2009.

Laws 2009, LB403, § 11.